Washington statutes.
RCW 19.270.050

Application and construction of RCW 19.270.020 (5) through (11) or 19.270.040.

(1) Neither RCW 19.270.020 (5) through (11) nor 19.270.040 apply to any monitoring of, or interaction with, a subscriber's internet or other network connection or service, or a computer, by a telecommunications carrier, cable operator, computer hardware or software provider, or provider of information service or interactive computer service for network or computer security purposes, diagnostics, technical support, maintenance, repair, authorized updates of software or system firmware, authorized remote system management, or detection or prevention of the unauthorized use of or fraudulent or other illegal activities in connection with a network, service, or computer software, including scanning for and removing software under this chapter.

(2) This section shall not be construed to provide a defense to liability under the common law or any other state or federal law, nor shall it be construed as an affirmative grant of authority to engage in any of the activities listed in this section.

[ 2008 c 66 s 4; 2005 c 500 s 5.]